Utah statutes.
59-2-203.   Record of assessment of railroads and other companies -- Review
by county assessor.
(1)  Each year the commission shall prepare a record of assessment of
railroads and rail car companies.  The record shall include:
(a)  the name of the person to whom the property was assessed;
(b)  the number of miles in the state;
(c)  the number of miles in each county;
(d)  the total assessment of that property; and
(e)  the amount of the apportionment of the total assessment to each county.
(2)  At least quarterly, the commission shall prepare a record of assessment
of state-assessed commercial vehicles.
(3)  The record of the assessment and the information upon which the
assessments and apportionments are made are available for review upon request
by a county assessor.
